North Carolina, session 2025, HB406.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PREVENT UNFAIR DEALER FRANCHISE TERMINATIONS AND CLARIFY RV
DEALER TERMINATION ASSISTANCE RIGHTS
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-305 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-305. Coercing dealer to accept commodities not ordered; threatening to cancel
franchise; preventing transfer of ownership; granting additional franchises;
terminating franchises without good cause; preventing family succession.
It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch,
or any field representative, officer, agent, or any representative whatsoever of any of them:
…
(4) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, to prevent or refuse to
approve the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by the sale of the
business, stock transfer, or otherwise, or the transfer, sale or assignment of a
dealer franchise, or a change in the executive management or principal
operator of the dealership, change in use of an existing facility to provide for
the sales or service of one or more additional line-makes of new motor
vehicles, or relocation of the dealership to another site within the dealership's
relevant market area, if the Commissioner has determined, if requested in
writing by the dealer within 30 days after receipt of an objection to the
proposed transfer, sale, assignment, relocation, or change, and after a hearing
on the matter, that the failure to permit or honor the transfer, sale, assignment,
relocation, or change is unreasonable under the circumstances. The following
applies:
…
i. It is unlawful for a manufacturer to, in any way, do any of the
following:
1. Condition its approval of a proposed transfer, sale, assignment,
change in the dealer's executive management, principal
operator, or appointment of a designated successor, on the
existing or proposed dealer's willingness to construct a new
facility, renovate the existing facility, acquire or refrain from
acquiring one or more line-makes of vehicles, separate or
*H406-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
divest one or more line-makes of vehicle, or establish or
maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space.
…
4. Condition, directly or indirectly, the approval of the sale or
transfer of the ownership of a dealership by the sale of the
business, stock transfer, or otherwise, or the transfer, sale,
succession, or assignment of a dealer's franchise, or a change
in the executive management or principal operator of the
dealership, or a dealer's proposed relocation of the dealership
facility, or a dealer's satisfaction of the terms of any incentive
program or contest, upon the existing or proposed dealer's
willingness to enter into a right of first refusal in favor of the
manufacturer.
5. In determining whether to approve a dealer's proposed transfer,
sale, assignment, change in the dealer's executive management,
principal operator, or appointment of a designated successor,
to inquire about or consider whether another manufacturer or
distributor had previously denied, rejected, or otherwise turned
down the application of the applicant, or any person or entity
affiliated with the applicant, to acquire a franchise or
dealership or become principal operator, part of the executive
management, or a successor owner or manager of a dealership.
6. In determining whether to approve a dealer's proposed transfer,
sale, assignment, change in the dealer's executive management,
principal operator, or appointment of a designated successor,
to inquire about or consider whether the applicant, or any
person or entity affiliated with the applicant, had, for any
reason, ever previously commenced a civil or administrative
proceeding against any manufacturer or distributor.
j. If a manufacturer or distributor objects to, denies, rejects, or otherwise
turns down a dealer's proposed transfer, sale, assignment, change in
the dealer's executive management, principal operator, or appointment
of a designated successor, the manufacturer or distributor shall
reimburse both the dealer and applicant for their respective attorneys'
fees, if either of the following is applicable:
1. Both the dealer and applicant elect not to appeal from or
otherwise seek civil or administrative redress from the decision
of the manufacturer to object to, deny, reject, or otherwise turn
down the dealer's application.
2. The decision of the manufacturer or distributor to object to,
deny, reject, or otherwise turn down the dealer's application is
ultimately overturned by a reviewing court or administrative
agency.
…
(6) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise or
notwithstanding the terms or provisions of any waiver, to terminate, cancel or
fail to renew any franchise with a licensed new motor vehicle dealer unless
the manufacturer has satisfied the notice requirements of sub-subdivision c.
of this subdivision and the Commissioner has determined, if requested in
writing by the dealer within (i) the time period specified in
G.S. 20-305(6)c.1.II., III., or IV., as applicable, or (ii) the effective date of the
Page 2 House Bill 406-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
franchise termination specified or proposed by the manufacturer in the notice
of termination, whichever period of time is longer, and after a hearing on the
matter, that there is good cause for the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of the franchise and that the manufacturer has acted in good faith
as defined in this act regarding the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal.
When such a petition is made to the Commissioner by a dealer for
determination as to the existence of good cause and good faith for the
termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of a franchise, the Commissioner
shall promptly inform the manufacturer that a timely petition has been filed,
and the franchise in question shall continue in effect pending the
Commissioner's decision. The Commissioner shall try to conduct the hearing
and render a final determination within 180 days after a petition has been filed.
If the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal is pursuant to
G.S. 20-305(6)c.1.III. then the Commissioner shall give the proceeding
priority consideration and shall try to render his final determination no later
than 90 days after the petition has been filed. Any parties to a hearing by the
Commissioner under this section shall have a right of review of the decision
in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes. Any determination of the Commissioner under this section finding
that good cause exists for the nonrenewal, cancellation, or termination of any
franchise shall automatically be stayed during any period that the affected
dealer shall have the right to judicial review or appeal of the determination
before the superior court or any other appellate court and during the pendency
of any appeal; provided, however, that within 30 days of entry of the
Commissioner's order, the affected dealer provide such security as the
reviewing court, in its discretion, may deem appropriate for payment of such
costs and damages as may be incurred or sustained by the manufacturer by
reason of and during the pendency of the stay. Although the right of the
affected dealer to such stay is automatic, the procedure for providing such
security and for the award of damages, if any, to the manufacturer upon
dissolution of the stay shall be in accordance with G.S. 1A-1, Rule 65(d) and
(e). No such security provided by or on behalf of any affected dealer shall be
forfeited or damages awarded against a dealer who obtains a stay under this
subdivision in the event the ownership of the affected dealership is
subsequently transferred, sold, or assigned to a third party in accordance with
this subdivision or subdivision (4) of this section and the closing on such
transfer, sale, or assignment occurs no later than 180 days after the date of
entry of the Commissioner's order. Furthermore, unless and until the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a dealer's franchise shall finally
become effective, in light of any stay or any order of the Commissioner
determining that good cause exists for the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of a dealer's franchise as provided in this subdivision, a dealer
who receives a notice of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal from a
manufacturer as provided in this subdivision shall continue to have the same
rights to assign, sell, or transfer the franchise to a third party under the
franchise and as permitted under G.S. 20-305(4) as if notice of the termination
had not been given by the manufacturer. Any franchise under notice or threat
of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal by the manufacturer which is duly
transferred in accordance with G.S. 20-305(4) shall not be subject to
termination by reason of failure of performance or breaches of the franchise
on the part of the transferor.
House Bill 406-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise
or the terms or provisions of any waiver, good cause shall exist for the
purposes of a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal when:
…
2. If the failure by the new motor vehicle dealer relates to the
performance of the new motor vehicle dealer in sales or
service, then good cause shall be defined as the failure of the
new motor vehicle dealer to comply with reasonable
performance criteria established by the manufacturer if the new
motor vehicle dealer was apprised by the manufacturer in
writing of the failure; and
…
II. The new motor vehicle dealer was afforded a
reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than 180
days, to comply with the criteria; and
III. The new motor vehicle dealer failed to demonstrate
substantial progress towards compliance with the
manufacturer's performance criteria during such period
and the new motor vehicle dealer's failure was not
primarily due to economic or market factors within the
dealer's relevant market area which were beyond the
dealer's control.control; and
IV. During the entire performance review period
established by the manufacturer, the manufacturer
made available to the dealer a sufficient number and
model mix of new motor vehicles for the dealer to
achieve all elements of the manufacturer's performance
criteria.
…
d. Payments.
1. Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, agreement, or
waiver, upon the termination, nonrenewal or cancellation of
any franchise by the manufacturer or distributor, the cessation
of business or the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of
any franchise by any new motor vehicle dealer located in this
State, or upon any of the occurrences set forth in
G.S. 20-305(6)c.1.IV., the manufacturer or distributor shall
purchase from and compensate the new motor vehicle dealer
for all of the following:
I. Each new and unsold motor vehicle vehicle, and each
motorized or nonmotorized trailer, including, but not
limited to, travel trailers, slide-in truck campers, and
park models, within the new motor vehicle dealer's
inventory that has been acquired within 24 months of
the effective date of the termination from the
manufacturer or distributor or another same line-make
dealer in the ordinary course of business, and which has
not been substantially altered or damaged to the
prejudice of the manufacturer or distributor while in the
new motor vehicle dealer's possession, and which has
been driven less than 1,000 miles or, for purposes of a
Page 4 House Bill 406-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
recreational vehicle motor home as defined in
G.S. 20-4.01(32b)c., less than 1,500 2,500 miles
following the original date of delivery to the dealer, and
for which no certificate of title has been issued. For
purposes of this sub-subdivision, the term "ordinary
course of business" shall include inventory transfers of
all new, same line-make vehicles between affiliated
dealerships, or otherwise between dealerships having
common or interrelated ownership, provided that the
transfer is not intended solely for the purpose of
benefiting from the termination assistance described in
this sub-subdivision.
…
f. The provisions of sub-subdivision e. above shall not be applicable
when the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of the franchise
agreement by a new motor vehicle dealer is the result of the sale of
assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealership. The provisions of
sub-subdivisions d. and e. above shall not be applicable when the
termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of the franchise agreement is
at the initiation of a new motor vehicle dealer of recreational vehicle
motor homes, as defined in G.S. 20-4.01(32b)c., provided that at the
time of the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation, the recreational
vehicle manufacturer or distributor has paid to the dealer all claims for
warranty or recall work, including payments for labor, parts, and other
expenses, which were submitted by the dealer 30 days or more prior
to the date of termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation.
…."

DEALER COMPENSATION FOR THE SALE OF OVER-THE-AIR PRODUCTS AND
SERVICES
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-305(57) reads as rewritten:
"(57) To sell, or activate for a fee, any permanent or temporary motor vehicle
accessory, option, add-on, service, feature, improvement, or upgrade on or to
any motor vehicle owned or leased by a retail customer located in this State,
through over-the-air or remote means, unless the manufacturer or distributor
complies with all of the following requirements:
…
c. If the sale or activation of the permanent or temporary motor vehicle
accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature, or improvement
by either the manufacturer or the direct involvement of the dealer who
sells or leases the vehicle to the retail customer occurs at the time of
the new motor vehicle sale or lease, or within the 12-month period
immediately following the sale or lease of the new motor vehicle by a
North Carolina franchised motor vehicle dealer, the manufacturer or
distributor provides the franchised motor vehicle dealer that sold the
new motor vehicle reasonable compensation in an amount not less than
twenty percent (20%) of the gross compensation that was collected
from the customer for the sale or activation of the accessory, option,
add-on, service, upgrade, feature, or improvement to the original North
Carolina vehicle owner or lessee when the cost of which would equal
or exceed (i) fifty dollars ($50.00), if the cost or purchase price to the
House Bill 406-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
retail customer involves a single, one-time payment, or (ii)
seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in cumulative cost or purchase price over
any 12-month period, if the retail customer is making multiple or
periodic payments.
d. If the sale or activation of the permanent or temporary motor vehicle
accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature, or improvement
did not occur as provided in sub-subdivision c. of this subdivision, and
a North Carolina franchised new motor vehicle dealer of the
manufacturer or distributor was directly involved in the sale of the
feature or improvement, the manufacturer or distributor provides
reasonable compensation in an amount not less than twenty percent
(20%) of the gross compensation that was collected from the customer
to the North Carolina franchised new motor vehicle dealer that sold
the accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature, or
improvement to a North Carolina resident when the cost of which
would equal or exceed (i) fifty dollars ($50.00), if the cost or purchase
price to the retail customer involves a single, one-time payment, or (ii)
seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in cumulative cost or purchase price over
any 12-month period, if the retail customer is making multiple or
periodic payments.
…
f. When providing a new motor vehicle to a dealer for offer or sale to the
public, the manufacturer or distributor shall provide to the dealer a
written disclosure that may be furnished by the dealer to a potential
purchaser or lessee of the new motor vehicle identifying each
permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on,
service, upgrade, feature, or improvement of the vehicle that may be
initiated, updated, changed, or maintained by the manufacturer or
distributor through over-the-air or remote means, the cost to the retail
customer at the time of the new motor vehicle sale or lease, and the
fact that all such accessories, options, add-ons, services, upgrades,
features, or improvements may be purchased directly from the dealer.
Every manufacturer or distributor that, through over-the-air or remote
means, provides any permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory,
option, add-on, service, feature, improvement, or upgrade on or to any
motor vehicle owned or leased by a retail customer located in this State
shall provide to each of its franchised dealers within this State, on a
basis no less frequently than monthly, a statement itemizing the type,
volume, and gross receipts generated from the sales of over-the-air or
remotely activated products and services that were sold to the dealer's
customers and calculating the fees and commissions to which the
dealer is entitled pursuant to this sub-subdivision. A manufacturer or
distributor may comply with this sub-subdivision by notifying the
dealer that such information is available on a website or by other
digital means."

FACILITATE DEALER TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP TO QUALIFIED BUYERS
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-305(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, to prevent or refuse to
approve the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by the sale of the
business, stock transfer, or otherwise, or the transfer, sale or assignment of a
Page 6 House Bill 406-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
dealer franchise, or a change in the executive management or principal
operator of the dealership, change in use of an existing facility to provide for
the sales or service of one or more additional line-makes of new motor
vehicles, or relocation of the dealership to another site within the dealership's
relevant market area, if the Commissioner has determined, if requested in
writing by the dealer within 30 days after receipt of an objection to the
proposed transfer, sale, assignment, relocation, or change, and after a hearing
on the matter, that the failure to permit or honor the transfer, sale, assignment,
relocation, or change is unreasonable under the circumstances. The following
applies:
…
e. With respect to a proposed change in the executive management or
principal operator of the dealership, the sole issue for determination
by the Commissioner and the sole issue on which the Commissioner
shall hear or consider evidence shall be whether, by reason of lack of
training, lack of prior experience, poor past performance, or poor
character, the proposed candidate for a position within the executive
management or as principal operator of the dealership is unfit for the
position. For purposes of this subdivision, the refusal by the
manufacturer to accept a proposed candidate for executive
management or as principal operator who is of good moral character
and who otherwise meets the written, reasonable, and uniformly
applied standards or qualifications, if any, of the manufacturer relating
to the business experience and prior performance of executive
management required by the manufacturers of its dealers is presumed
to demonstrate the manufacturer's failure to prove the proposed
candidate for executive management or as principal operator is unfit
to serve the capacity. If the manufacturer is in any part basing its
decision to object to the proposed change in the executive management
or principal operator of the dealership on the candidate's alleged poor
past performance, the manufacturer shall have the burden of proving
that, during the immediately preceding three calendar-year period, the
average overall sales performance or average overall customer
satisfaction performance of all of the dealerships owned or operated
by the candidate, when considering all line-makes of new motor
vehicles sold by the franchised dealerships owned or operated by the
candidate, was below the national average as measured by each such
line-make. In its notice of objection, the manufacturer is required to
cite and provide the specific data and calculations upon which the
manufacturer bases its contention that during the immediately
preceding three calendar-year period, the candidate's overall sales
performance or average overall customer satisfaction performance of
all of the dealerships owned or operated by the candidate, when
considering all line-makes of new motor vehicles sold by the
franchised dealerships owned or operated by the candidate, was below
the national average as measured by each such line-make. For
purposes of this subdivision, the sales performance or customer
satisfaction performance of a dealership that has been owned by the
candidate for less than two years prior to the date the existing dealer
notified the manufacturer or distributor of the proposed change in the
executive management or principal operator of the dealership may not
House Bill 406-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be used in whole or in part as a basis for rejecting the candidate's
application.
…."

CLARIFY DEFINITION OF MOTOR VEHICLE DEALER
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-286(11) reads as rewritten:
"(11) Motor vehicle dealer or dealer. –
a. A person who does any of the following:
…
6. For commission, money, or other thing of value, or on behalf
of another person sharing ten percent (10%) or more common
ownership, offers new vehicles as part of a subscription
program. This sub-sub-subdivision shall not apply to any
person providing a vehicle subscription or monthly rental
program on or after January 1, 2025.
7. Performs any warranty service or recall work on motor
vehicles; provided, however, that this sub-sub-subdivision
shall not be applicable with respect to a commercial fleet
customer that has a designation as such by the manufacturer or
distributor.
…."

DEFINITION OF SELLING
SECTION 5. G.S. 20-286 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-286. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(15a) Sell. – The terms "sell," "exchange," "retail sales," "selling activities," and
"lease" and their cognates are synonymous. Selling includes all of the
following:
a. Directly, or indirectly, offering or advertising for sale, taking deposits
or down payments, or receiving payment of any kind for the ordering,
reservation, purchase, lease, exchange, subscription, or use of a motor
vehicle.
b. Accepting a reservation for a specific motor vehicle identified by
Vehicle Identification Number or other product identifier from a retail
consumer.
c. Setting the retail price for the purchase, lease, or exchange of a motor
vehicle.
d. Offering or negotiating terms for the purchase, lease, finance, or
exchange of a motor vehicle with a retail consumer.
e. Negotiating directly with a retail consumer the value of a motor
vehicle being traded in as part of the purchase, lease, exchange,
subscription, or use of a motor vehicle.
f. Offering or negotiating directly with a retail consumer any service
contract, extended warranty, vehicle maintenance contract, guaranteed
asset protection agreement, or any other vehicle-related products and
services in connection with the purchase, lease, or exchange of a motor
vehicle.
g. Any transaction where the title of a motor vehicle or a used motor
vehicle is transferred to a retail consumer.
Page 8 House Bill 406-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
h. Any retail lease transaction where a retail consumer leases a vehicle
for a period of at least 12 months.
(15a)(15b) Special tool or essential tool. – A tool designed and required by the
manufacturer or distributor and not readily available from another source that
is utilized for the purpose of performing service repairs on a motor vehicle
sold by a manufacturer or distributor to its franchised new motor vehicle
dealers in this State.
…."

CLARIFY DEALERSHIP SUCCESSION
SECTION 6. G.S. 20-305(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Notwithstanding the terms of any contract or agreement, to prevent or refuse
to honor the succession to a dealership, including the franchise, by a motor
vehicle dealer's designated successor as provided for under this subsection.
The following applies:
a. Any owner of a new motor vehicle dealership may appoint by will, or
any other written instrument, a designated successor to succeed in the
respective ownership interest or interest as principal operator of the
owner in the new motor vehicle dealership, including the franchise,
upon the retirement, death or incapacity of the owner or principal
operator. In order for succession to the position of principal operator
to occur by operation of law in accordance with sub-subdivision c.
below, the owner's choice of a successor must be approved by the
dealer, in accordance with the dealer's bylaws, if applicable, either
prior or subsequent to the death or incapacity of the existing principal
operator.
…."

UNFINISHED VEHICLES AND COST OF TRAINING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 7. G.S. 20-305 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-305. Coercing dealer to accept commodities not ordered; threatening to cancel
franchise; preventing transfer of ownership; granting additional franchises;
terminating franchises without good cause; preventing family succession.
It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch,
or any field representative, officer, agent, or any representative whatsoever of any of them:
…
(58) To sell, transfer to floor plan, assign a certificate of origin, or otherwise require
a dealer to accept ownership or possession of a new motor vehicle that either
(i) cannot be immediately sold at retail due to the existence of an open recall,
missing or inoperable part or component, or stop sale order or (ii) has not
actually been delivered to a dealer within 90 days after the manufacturer or
distributor has represented to the dealer that the vehicle was shipped.
(59) To vary the price charged to a dealer for any training, software, equipment, or
tools that is in any way based upon a dealer's compliance with a facility image
program or requirement."

WARRANTY REIMBURSEMENT CLARIFICATIONS
SECTION 8. G.S. 20-305.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-305.1. Automobile dealer warranty and recall obligations.
(a) Each motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor or distributor branch,
shall specify in writing to each of its motor vehicle dealers licensed in this State the dealer's
House Bill 406-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
obligations for preparation, delivery, pre-sale maintenance, manufacturer-directed component
installation or assembly, warranty, manufacturer-sponsored maintenance programs,
manufacturer extended warranty, parts exchange programs, and recall service on its products.
The disclosure required under this subsection shall include the schedule of compensation to be
paid the dealers for parts, work, and service in connection with preparation, delivery, warranty,
and recall service, and the time allowances for the performance of the work and service. In no
event shall the schedule of compensation fail to include reasonable compensation for diagnostic
work, shipping, if required by the manufacturer or distributor, and for battery disposal or other
disposal charges or airbag shipping, storage, or disposal, for shipping, storage, or disposal of any
other parts, fluids, or vehicle components, and for all other associated fees that were actually
incurred by the dealer, and associated administrative requirements as well as repair service and
labor. Time allowances for the performance of preparation, delivery, warranty, and recall work
and service shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed. The compensation
paid under this section shall be reasonable, provided, however, that under no circumstances shall
the reasonable compensation under this section for warranty and recall service be in an amount
less than the dealer's current retail labor rate and the amount charged to retail customers for the
manufacturer's or distributor's original parts for nonwarranty work of like kind, provided the
amount is competitive with the retail rates charged for parts and labor by other franchised dealers
of the same line-make located within the dealer's market. If there is no other same line-make
dealer located in the dealer's market or if all other same line-make dealers in the dealer's market
are owned or operated by the same entities or individuals as the dealership being compared, the
retail rates charged for parts and labor by other franchised dealers located in the dealer's market
that sell competing line-make motor vehicles as the dealer may be considered when determining
whether the dealer's rates are competitive.kind.
…
(a5) A motor vehicle dealer may accept a manufacturer's, factory branch's, distributor's, or
distributor branch's labor time guide as adequate and fair compensation for labor services
rendered for repairs in an amount equal to the amount a retail customer pays for the same labor
services with regard to labor time or may elect to establish an average retail labor time allowance
pursuant to subsection (a6) of this section.
(a6) A motor vehicle dealer may elect to establish an average retail labor time allowance
in lieu of the manufacturer's, factory branch's, distributor's, or distributor branch's labor time
guide for manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch-paid repairs or service
by submitting to the motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch
100 sequential customer paid service repair orders or 90 days of customer paid service repair
orders, whichever is less, covering repairs made no more than 180 days before the submission,
and dividing the total number of hours allowed by the franchisor for any such repairs under the
franchisor's labor time guide into the total number of hours actually billed to the franchisee's
retail customers and declaring the average percentage labor time allowance over the franchisor's
labor time guide for franchisor-paid repairs or service. The resulting quotient shall be applied to
the applicable manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch labor time guide to
establish the motor vehicle dealer's average retail labor time allowance. The average retail labor
time allowance so declared shall go into effect 30 days following the declaration subject to audit
by the motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch only of the
sample submitted by the motor vehicle dealer and any adjustment of the average labor time
allowance made by the motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor
branch based only on an audit of that sample.
…."

LOANER VEHICLE COST REIMBURSEMENT
SECTION 9. G.S. 20-305(33) reads as rewritten:
Page 10 House Bill 406-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(33) To fail to reimburse a dealer located in this State in full for the actual cost,
including applicable taxes and third-party fees, of providing a loaner or rental
vehicle to any customer who is having a vehicle serviced at the dealership if
the provision of such a loaner or rental vehicle is required or approved by the
manufacturer. It is unlawful for a manufacturer to fail to reimburse the dealer
in full as provided above (i) whether or not the dealer provides the customer
with a model vehicle similar to the vehicle the customer brought in for service,
in the event the dealer does not have a similar model loaner or rental vehicle
available, or (ii) if the provision of a rental or loaner vehicle to a customer is
required or approved by the manufacturer or distributor and further provided
that all or any portion of the time the dealer has provided the customer with a
loaner or rental vehicle is due to the unavailability of one or more parts sold
or distributed by the manufacturer or through a supplier designated or
approved by the manufacturer.manufacturer, or whether or not the
manufacturer has its own loaner program in which the dealer has elected not
to participate. The manufacturer shall allow a dealer to submit a claim for
rental vehicle reimbursement as required pursuant to this subdivision, in
30-day increments, prior to the end of the rental vehicle period if the repair
for which the rental vehicle is associated is open due to a delay in parts or
repair information from the manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or
distributor branch."

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 10. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 11. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to all current
and future franchises and other agreements in existence between any new motor vehicle dealer
located in this State and a manufacturer or distributor as of the effective date of this act.
House Bill 406-First Edition Page 11